Tennessee statutes. Title 22 Juries And Jurors
Part 3

Jury Selection and Attendance [Repealed]

22-5-301. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-302. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-303. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-304. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-305. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-306. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-307. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-308. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-309. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-310. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-311. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-312. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-313. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-314. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.

22-5-315. [Repealed.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former ch. 5 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-10, 12-16, 18, 21; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, § 1; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-5, 7- 11; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-244; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3; T.C.A. §§ 22-2-101, 22-2-102; 22-2-201 — 22-2-204; 22-2-301 — 22-2-315) was impliedly deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2011. Chapter 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2). Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, title 22, ch. 2 is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with title 22, ch. 2 as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5. Title 22, ch. 5 was deleted by the code commission as obsolete.